Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4012.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 20925. (1) This part does not prohibit an ambulance from providing emergency transport of a police dog that is injured in the line of duty or a retired police dog to a veterinary clinic or similar facility, if the police dog or retired police dog is in need of emergency medical treatment and there are no individuals who require transport or emergency assistance at that time. Ambulance personnel may require that a police officer accompany the police dog or retired police dog during the emergency transport. (2) As used in this section: , "police (a) "Police dog" means that term as defined in section 50c of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.50c. (b) "Retired police dog" means a dog that is trained for law enforcement work and that was used by a law enforcement agency of this state or of a local unit of government of this state until the dog ceased to work due to age or disease.